src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-6-tengkwe_gt-norm.yaml
#Past participle, dual object
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg1+OcDu: тэ̄магум
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg2+OcDu: тэ̄магын
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg3+OcDu: тэ̄маге
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu1+OcDu: [тэ̄магаме̄н, тэ̄магагме̄н]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu2+OcDu: [тэ̄магы̄н, тэ̄магагы̄н]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu3+OcDu: [тэ̄магы̄г, тэ̄магагы̄г]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl1+OcDu: [тэ̄магув, тэ̄магӯв]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl2+OcDu: [тэ̄магы̄н, тэ̄магагы̄н]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl3+OcDu: [тэ̄магагыл, тэ̄магаганыл]

#Past participle, plural object
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg1+OcPl: [тэ̄манум, тэ̄мананум]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg2+OcPl: [тэ̄ман, тэ̄ма̄нын]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg3+OcPl: [тэ̄ма̄нэ, тэ̄мана̄нэ]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu1+OcPl: [тэ̄манаме̄н, тэ̄мананме̄н]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu2+OcPl: [тэ̄манн, тэ̄маны̄н, тэ̄мананы̄н]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu3+OcPl: [тэ̄манэ̄н, тэ̄мананэ̄н]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl1+OcPl: [тэ̄манув, тэ̄манӯв, тэ̄мананув, тэ̄мананӯв]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl2+OcPl: [тэ̄маны̄н, тэ̄мананы̄н]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl3+OcPl: [тэ̄ма̄ныл, тэ̄мана̄ныл]

#Gerund
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Ger: та̄им
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Ger+PxSg1: та̄имам
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Ger+PxSg2: та̄иман
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Ger+PxSg3: [та̄има, та̄иматэ]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Ger+PxDu1: та̄имаме̄н
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Ger+PxDu2: та̄иман
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Ger+PxDu3: та̄имаг
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Ger+PxPl1: та̄имав
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Ger+PxPl2: та̄иман
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Ger+PxPl3: та̄имат

#Privative
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+VAbess: тэ̄гтал
